Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-1001
Governor; powers.

To permit the orderly continuation of the issuance of private activity bonds pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code, the Governor may by executive order:

(1) Allocate or establish a method for the allocation of the private activity bond state ceiling set forth in the Internal Revenue Code among any or all entities in the State of Nebraska having the authority to issue private activity bonds or governmental bonds; and

(2) Delegate any administrative authority vested in him or her under this section to any state agency or any instrumentality which exercises essential public functions.

Laws 1988, LB 1233, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 14.